Utah statutes.
68-3-8.   When a day appointed is a holiday.

Whenever any act of a secular nature, other than a work of necessity or mercy, is appointed by law or contract to be performed upon a particular day, which day falls upon a legal holiday, such act may be performed upon the next succeeding business day with the same effect as if it had been performed upon the day appointed.

